Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB171.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1302.1. Wastewater utility deduct meter tariff requirement.(a) Deduct meter program.--Each wastewater utility shall develop a deduct meter program, which shall allow for eligible customers the installation of a deduct meter as a part of any new tariff or tariff supplement.(b) Billing.--A wastewater utility shall provide customers with the option to be billed for wastewater services based on:(1) total water usage; or(2) net sewer outflow, calculated as total water usage minus the volume measured by the deduct meter.123456789101112131415161718 (c) Requirements for eligibility.--An eligible customer electing to participate in the deduct meter program must:(1) have a metered water supply and be current on all wastewater utility payments; and(2) be responsible for:(i) purchasing, installing and maintaining a utility-approved deduct meter;(ii) ensuring that the meter is installed at an approved location and available for inspection as needed by the utility; and(iii) submitting meter readings or allowing utility access for reading and verification.(d) Fee.--A wastewater utility may charge a reasonable administrative or inspection fee, subject to commission approval.(e) Duties.--The commission shall:(1) approve deduct meter models and installation standards;(2) maintain a registration system for deduct meters;(3) provide clear program guidelines and application procedures to customers; and(4) review and approve all deduct meter tariffs to ensure consistency, fairness and customer protection.(f) Regulations.--The commission may adopt regulations to implement this section, including standardizing deduct meter eligibility, calibration and reporting requirements.(g) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Deduct meter." A secondary water meter installed to measure 20260HB0171PN2801 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 water that is not discharged into the sanitary sewer system, including water used for irrigation, pools and other outdoor uses."Eligible customer." A residential customer with a metered water supply who meets the program requirements as provided under this section."Wastewater utility." A wastewater utility under the jurisdiction of this Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB0171PN2801 - 3 - 123456789